Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-101.02
Public Service Commission; districts; population figures and maps; basis.

For purposes of section 75-101.01, the Legislature adopts the official population figures and maps from the 2020 Census Redistricting (Public Law 94-171) TIGER/Line Shapefiles published by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1971, LB 955, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 551, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 5-107.01;

Laws 1991, LB 618, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 855, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB700, § 2;

Laws 2021, First Spec. Sess., LB5, § 2.